Illinois, session 104th, HB5054.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-8.10 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/9-8.10)7    Sec. 9-8.10. Use of political committee and other 8reporting organization funds. 9    (a) A political committee shall not make expenditures: 10        (1) In violation of any law of the United States or of 11    this State. 12        (2) Clearly in excess of the fair market value of the 13    services, materials, facilities, or other things of value 14    received in exchange. 15        (3) For satisfaction or repayment of any debts other 16    than loans made to the committee or to the public official 17    or candidate on behalf of the committee or repayment of 18    goods and services purchased by the committee under a 19    credit agreement. Nothing in this Section authorizes the 20    use of campaign funds to repay personal loans. The 21    repayments shall be made by check written to the person 22    who made the loan or credit agreement. The terms and 23    conditions of any loan or credit agreement to a committee   HB5054- 2 -LRB104 18583 SPS 32026 b1    shall be set forth in a written agreement, including but 2    not limited to the method and amount of repayment, that 3    shall be executed by the chair or treasurer of the 4    committee at the time of the loan or credit agreement. The 5    loan or agreement shall also set forth the rate of 6    interest for the loan, if any, which may not substantially 7    exceed the prevailing market interest rate at the time the 8    agreement is executed. 9        (4) For the satisfaction or repayment of any debts or 10    for the payment of any expenses relating to a personal 11    residence. Campaign funds may not be used as collateral 12    for home mortgages. The provisions of this paragraph do 13    not apply to expenditures by a political committee for 14    expenses related to: (i) a public official's or 15    candidate's personal security services provided by a 16    private security contractor agency licensed under the 17    Private Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, 18    Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004 or security 19    enhancements to a public official's or candidate's primary 20    residence, including, but not limited to, security 21    systems, cameras, walls, fences, or other physical 22    structures, if the security services or security 23    enhancements are reasonably necessary due to risks arising 24    from the public official's or candidate's political or 25    governmental duties; or (ii) cybersecurity measures or 26    tools used to protect and secure a public official's or   HB5054- 3 -LRB104 18583 SPS 32026 b1    candidate's personal, political, and government devices, 2    Internet networks, or other technology, if the 3    cybersecurity measures or tools are reasonably necessary 4    due to risks arising from the public official's or 5    candidate's political or governmental duties.6        (5) For clothing or personal laundry expenses, except 7    clothing items rented by the public official or candidate 8    for his or her own use exclusively for a specific 9    campaign-related event, provided that committees may 10    purchase costumes, novelty items, or other accessories 11    worn primarily to advertise the candidacy. 12        (6) For the travel expenses of any person unless the 13    travel is necessary for fulfillment of political, 14    governmental, or public policy duties, activities, or 15    purposes. 16        (7) For membership or club dues charged by 17    organizations, clubs, or facilities that are primarily 18    engaged in providing health, exercise, or recreational 19    services; provided, however, that funds received under 20    this Article may be used to rent the clubs or facilities 21    for a specific campaign-related event. 22        (8) In payment for anything of value or for 23    reimbursement of any expenditure for which any person has 24    been reimbursed by the State or any person. For purposes 25    of this item (8), a per diem allowance is not a 26    reimbursement.   HB5054- 4 -LRB104 18583 SPS 32026 b1        (9) For the lease or purchase of or installment 2    payment for a motor vehicle unless the political committee 3    can demonstrate the vehicle will be used primarily for 4    campaign purposes or for the performance of governmental 5    duties. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a political 6    committee from using political funds to make expenditures 7    related to vehicles not purchased or leased by a political 8    committee, provided the expenditure relates to the use of 9    the vehicle for primarily campaign purposes or the 10    performance of governmental duties. Persons using vehicles 11    not purchased or leased by a political committee may be 12    reimbursed for actual mileage for the use of the vehicle 13    for campaign purposes or for the performance of 14    governmental duties. The mileage reimbursements shall be 15    made at a rate not to exceed the standard mileage rate 16    method for computation of business expenses under the 17    Internal Revenue Code. 18        (10) Directly for an individual's tuition or other 19    educational expenses, except for governmental or political 20    purposes directly related to a candidate's or public 21    official's duties and responsibilities. 22        (11) For payments to a public official or candidate or 23    his or her family member unless for compensation for 24    services actually rendered by that person. The provisions 25    of this item (11) do not apply to expenditures by a 26    political committee for expenses related to providing   HB5054- 5 -LRB104 18583 SPS 32026 b1    childcare for a minor child or care for a dependent family 2    member if the care is reasonably necessary for the public 3    official or candidate to fulfill political or governmental 4    duties. The provisions of this item (11) do not apply to 5    expenditures by a political committee in an aggregate 6    amount not exceeding the amount of funds reported to and 7    certified by the State Board or county clerk as available 8    as of June 30, 1998, in the semi-annual report of 9    contributions and expenditures filed by the political 10    committee for the period concluding June 30, 1998. 11    (b) The Board shall have the authority to investigate, 12upon receipt of a verified complaint, violations of the 13provisions of this Section. The Board may levy a fine on any 14person who knowingly makes expenditures in violation of this 15Section and on any person who knowingly makes a malicious and 16false accusation of a violation of this Section. The Board may 17act under this subsection only upon the affirmative vote of at 18least 5 of its members. The fine shall not exceed $500 for each 19expenditure of $500 or less and shall not exceed the amount of 20the expenditure plus $500 for each expenditure greater than 21$500. The Board shall also have the authority to render 22rulings and issue opinions relating to compliance with this 23Section. 24    (c) Nothing in this Section prohibits the expenditure of 25funds of a political committee controlled by an officeholder 26or by a candidate to defray the customary and reasonable   HB5054- 6 -LRB104 18583 SPS 32026 b1expenses of an officeholder in connection with the performance 2of governmental and public service functions. 3    (d) Nothing in this Section prohibits the funds of a 4political committee which is controlled by a person convicted 5of a violation of any of the offenses listed in subsection (a) 6of Section 10 of the Public Corruption Profit Forfeiture Act 7from being forfeited to the State under Section 15 of the 8Public Corruption Profit Forfeiture Act. 9(Source: P.A. 104-443, eff. 1-1-26.)